District of Columbia statutes.
7-2902

Qualifications; membership; terms of office.

(a)

The Commission shall consist of 11 members as follows:

(1)

There shall be 3 ex-officio voting members as follows:

(A)

The Mayor of the District of Columbia (“Mayor”);

(B)

The Chairman of the Council of the District of Columbia (“Council”); and

(C)

The Chairman of the Council’s Committee on Human Services.

(2)

There shall be 5 members appointed by the Mayor and 3 members appointed by the Council by resolution.

(A)

Appointed members of the Commission shall be persons with proven expertise in health care delivery, finance, insurance, public health, integrated health care delivery systems, or strategic planning.

(B)

Appointed members of the Commission shall be residents of the District.

(b)

A vacancy on the Commission shall be filled in the same manner that the original appointment was made.

(c)

The Commission shall select a chair from among its ex-officio members.

(d)

Six members of the Commission shall constitute a quorum.

(e)

The term of members shall end 180 days after October 20, 1999.

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 1303, 46 DCR 6373

History